South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3111.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 5, Chapter 7, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-7-2410. The Department of Social Services shall collect information about the outcomes of youth who have aged out of foster care and provide a report annually to the General Assembly that sets forth the outcomes and analyzes the data. If the department is required to collect and submit such information to the Children's Bureau or another federal agency, the department may provide to the General Assembly the information collected for and submitted to the federal government to comply with the requirements of this provision. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----